Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 10

Additur and Remittitur

20-10-101. Additur.

In cases where, in the opinion of the trial judge, a jury verdict is not adequate to compensate the plaintiff or plaintiffs in compensatory damages or punitive damages, the trial judge may suggest an additur in such amount or amounts as the trial judge deems proper to the compensatory or punitive damages awarded by the jury, or both such classes of damages.

If the additur is accepted by the defense, it shall then be ordered by the trial judge and become the verdict, and if not accepted, the trial judge shall grant the plaintiff's motion for a new trial because of the inadequacy of the verdict upon proper motion being made by the plaintiff.

In all jury trials had in civil actions, after the verdict has been rendered and on motion for a new trial, when the trial judge is of the opinion that the verdict in favor of a party should be increased and an additur is suggested by the trial judge on that account, with the proviso that in case the party against whom the verdict has been rendered refuses to make the additur, a new trial will be awarded, the party against whom such verdict has been rendered may make such additur under protest, and appeal from the action of the trial judge to the court of appeals.

The court of appeals shall review the action of the trial court suggesting an additur using the standard of review provided for in T.R.A.P. 13(d) applicable to decisions of the trial court sitting without a jury. If the court of appeals is of the opinion that the verdict of the jury should not have been increased or that the amount of the additur is improper, but that the judgment of the trial court is correct in all other respects, the case shall be reversed to that extent, and the court of appeals may order remitted all or any part of the additur.

Acts 1969, ch. 137, § 1; 1970, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1330; Acts 1987, ch. 232, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-59.02-2.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 258, 259; 9 Tenn. Juris., Damages, §§ 25, 41, 51; 20 Tenn. Juris., New Trials, § 16.

Law Reviews.

Family Law — Alexander v. Inman: The Tennessee Court of Appeals Establishes Guidelines for Contingent Attorneys' Fees in Domestic Relation Cases, 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1575 (1996).

Moving to Comparative Negligence in an Era of Tort Reform: Decisions for Tennessee (Carol A. Mutter), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 199 (1990).

Paine on Procedure: Remittitur and Additur (Donald F. Paine), 42 Tenn B.J. 25 (2006).

Torts — Hodges v. S.C. Toof & Co.: New Substantive and Procedural Changes in the Awarding of Punitive Damages in Tennessee, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 239 (1992).

A Distinction Without a Difference: Revisiting the Constitutionality of Additur in Federal Courts, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 625 (2017).

Comparative Legislation. Additur and remittitur:

Ala. R.C.P. 59(f).

Ark. Code §§16-64-124,16-19-802.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §5-6-10 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-1-55.

Cited: Smith v. Williams, 575 S.W.2d 503, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 321, 9 A.L.R.4th 1033 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978); Owen v. Locke, 650 S.W.2d 51, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 558 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983); Long v. Mattingly, 797 S.W.2d 889, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 450 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Alexander v. Inman, 903 S.W.2d 686, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 70 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Palanki v. Vanderbilt Univ., 215 S.W.3d 380, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2006); Meals v. Ford Motor Co., — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 234 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 13, 2012); Gaw v. Vanderbilt Univ., — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 255 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 19, 2012); Johnson v. Beverly Nunis & Farmer's Ins. Exch., 383 S.W.3d 122, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 277 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 27, 2012).

20-10-102. Remittitur.

In all jury trials had in civil actions, after the verdict has been rendered and on motion for a new trial, when the trial judge is of the opinion that the verdict in favor of a party should be reduced and a remittitur is suggested by the trial judge on that account, with the proviso that in case the party in whose favor the verdict has been rendered refuses to make the remittitur, a new trial will be awarded, the party in whose favor such verdict has been rendered may make such remittitur under protest, and appeal from the action of the trial judge to the court of appeals.

The court of appeals shall review the action of the trial court suggesting a remittitur using the standard of review provided for in T.R.A.P. 13(d) applicable to decisions of the trial court sitting without a jury. If, in the opinion of the court of appeals, the verdict of the jury should not have been reduced, but the judgment of the trial court is correct in other respects, the case shall be reversed to that extent, and judgment shall be rendered in the court of appeals for the full amount originally awarded by the jury in the trial court.

Acts 1911, ch. 29, § 1; Shan., § 4852a1; Code 1932, § 8987; Acts 1949, ch. 253, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8987; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-118; Acts 1987, ch. 232, § 2.

Cross-References. Remittitur where sum found exceeds jurisdiction of general sessions court, §16-15-726.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-59.02-2.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 30, 51, 122, 238, 246-259; 9 Tenn. Juris., Damages, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Moving to Comparative Negligence in an Era of Tort Reform: Decisions for Tennessee (Carol A. Mutter), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 199 (1990).

Paine on Procedure: Remittitur and Additur (Donald F. Paine), 42 Tenn B.J. 25 (2006).

Torts — Hodges v. S.C. Toof & Co.: New Substantive and Procedural Changes in the Awarding of Punitive Damages in Tennessee, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 239 (1992).

A Distinction Without a Difference: Revisiting the Constitutionality of Additur in Federal Courts, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 625 (2017).

20-10-103. Remittitur under protest — Review by supreme court.

If the judgment of the trial court with regard to a remittitur is affirmed in the court of appeals, so that a party is required to make a remittitur or suffer a new trial, as in the judgment of the trial court, or if, by the opinion of the court of appeals, a further or a larger remittitur is required of the party in whose favor the verdict was rendered, or if after the case was tried in the lower court by the trial judge without a jury, or if after the case was tried in the lower court with a jury and no remittitur was suggested by the trial judge, a remittitur is first suggested or required in the court of appeals, on penalty of granting a new trial, then in each and all of these events the party in whose favor the verdict or judgment has been rendered may make the remittitur under protest in the court of appeals, and take the case, by application for permission to appeal, for review upon that point, to the supreme court.

If, in the opinion of the supreme court, the verdict should not have been reduced, and the court of appeals was in error in affirming the action of the trial court as to the remittitur, or if the court of appeals was, itself, in error in suggesting a remittitur for the first time in that court, or in suggesting a further or larger remittitur than that suggested in the trial court, and if the judgment is otherwise correct, the case shall be reversed to that extent, and judgment shall be rendered in the supreme court for the full amount originally awarded by the jury or the trial judge sitting without a jury, as the case may be.

Acts 1911, ch. 29, § 2; Shan., § 4852a2; Code 1932, § 8988; Acts 1949, ch. 253, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8988; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-119; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 11.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 122, 238-259; 9 Tenn. Juris., Damages, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Civil Procedure — Appellate Review of Trial Judge's Approval of Jury — Awarded Damages, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 94.

Paine on Procedure: Remittitur and Additur (Donald F. Paine), 42 Tenn B.J. 25 (2006).

Cited: Loftis v. Finch, 491 S.W.2d 370, 1972 Tenn. App. LEXIS 279 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1972); GRW Enterprises, Inc. v. Davis, 797 S.W.2d 606, 1990 Tenn. App. LEXIS 304 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1990); Riley v. Orr, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 386 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 11, 2010); Oglesby v. Riggins, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 131 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 17, 2011); Meals v. Ford Motor Co., — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 234 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 13, 2012).